New York, session 2025-2026, A8037.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 207-a of the general municipal 2 law, as amended by chapter 27 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. Any paid firefighter which term as used in this section shall mean 5 any paid officer or member of an organized fire company or fire depart- 6 ment of a city of less than one million population, or town, village or 7 fire district, or any paid firefighter of a county airport or county 8 aviation department which performs fire response or fire rescue duties, 9 who is injured in the performance of [his or her] their duties or who is 10 taken sick as a result of the performance of [his or her] their duties 11 so as to necessitate medical or other lawful remedial treatment, shall 12 be paid by the municipality or fire district by which [he or she is] 13 they are employed the full amount of [his or her] their regular salary 14 or wages until [his or her] their disability arising therefrom has 15 ceased, and, in addition, such municipality or fire district shall be 16 liable for all medical treatment and hospital care furnished during such 17 disability. For the purposes of this section, such disability shall 18 include post-traumatic stress disorder, as diagnosed by a psychiatrist 19 or psychologist, and shall be presumed to have been incurred during 20 service in the line of duty and shall be compensable under this section, 21 unless it is shown by a preponderance of the evidence that that post- 22 traumatic stress disorder was caused solely by nonservice-connected risk 23 factors or nonservice-connected exposure. Provided, however, and 24 notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the municipal EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07842-02-5 A. 8037 2 1 health authorities or any physician appointed for the purpose by the 2 municipality or fire district, may attend any such injured or sick fire- 3 fighter, from time to time, for the purpose of providing medical, surgi- 4 cal, or other treatment, or for making inspections and the municipality 5 or fire district shall not be liable for salary or wages payable to such 6 a firefighter, or for the cost of medical or hospital care or treatment 7 furnished, after such date as the health authorities or such physician 8 shall certify that such injured or sick firefighter has recovered and is 9 physically able to perform [his or her] their regular duties in the 10 company or department. Any injured or sick firefighter who shall refuse 11 to accept such medical treatment or hospital care or shall refuse to 12 permit medical inspections as herein authorized, including examinations 13 resulting from the application of subdivision two hereof, shall be 14 deemed to have waived [his or her] their rights under this section in 15 respect to expenses incurred for medical treatment or hospital care or 16 salary or wages payable after such refusal. 17 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a provider of 18 medical treatment or hospital care furnished pursuant to the provisions 19 of this section shall not collect or attempt to collect reimbursement 20 for such treatment or care from any such member of the fire department 21 of any such city. 22 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 207-c of the general municipal law, as 23 amended by section 55 of chapter 476 of the laws of 2018, is amended to 24 read as follows: 25 1. Any sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or corrections officer of 26 the sheriff's department of any county or any member of a police force 27 of any county, city of less than one million population, town or 28 village, or of any district, agency, board, body or commission thereof, 29 or any LIRR police officer as defined in paragraph two of subdivision a 30 of section three hundred eighty-nine of the retirement and social secu- 31 rity law whose benefits are provided in and pursuant to such section 32 three hundred eighty-nine, or a detective-investigator or any other 33 investigator who is a police officer pursuant to the provisions of the 34 criminal procedure law employed in the office of a district attorney of 35 any county, or any corrections officer of the county of Erie department 36 of corrections, or an advanced ambulance medical technician employed by 37 the county of Nassau, or any detention officer employed by the city of 38 Yonkers, or any supervising fire inspector, fire inspector, fire 39 marshal, or assistant fire marshal employed full-time in the county of 40 Nassau fire marshal's office, or at the option of the county of Nassau, 41 any probation officer of the county of Nassau who is injured in the 42 performance of [his or her] their duties or who is taken sick as a 43 result of the performance of [his or her] their duties so as to necessi- 44 tate medical or other lawful remedial treatment shall be paid by the 45 municipality or The Long Island Rail Road Company by which [he or she 46 is] they are employed the full amount of [his or her] their regular 47 salary or wages from such employer until [his or her] their disability 48 arising therefrom has ceased, and, in addition such municipality or The 49 Long Island Rail Road Company shall be liable for all medical treatment 50 and hospital care necessitated by reason of such injury or illness. For 51 the purposes of this section, such disability shall include post-trau- 52 matic stress disorder, as diagnosed by a psychiatrist or psychologist, 53 and shall be presumed to have been incurred during service in the line 54 of duty and shall be compensable under this section, unless it is shown 55 by a preponderance of the evidence that that post-traumatic stress 56 disorder was caused solely by nonservice-connected risk factors or A. 8037 3 1 nonservice-connected exposure. Provided, however, and notwithstanding 2 the foregoing provisions of this section, the municipal or The Long 3 Island Rail Road Company health authorities or any physician appointed 4 for the purpose by the municipality or The Long Island Rail Road Compa- 5 ny, as relevant, after a determination has first been made that such 6 injury or sickness was incurred during, or resulted from, such perform- 7 ance of duty, may attend any such injured or sick police officer, from 8 time to time, for the purpose of providing medical, surgical or other 9 treatment, or for making inspections, and the municipality or The Long 10 Island Rail Road Company, as the case may be, shall not be liable for 11 salary or wages payable to such police officer, or for the cost of 12 medical treatment or hospital care furnished after such date as such 13 health authorities or physician shall certify that such injured or sick 14 police officer has recovered and is physically able to perform [his or 15 her] their regular duties. Any injured or sick police officer who shall 16 refuse to accept medical treatment or hospital care or shall refuse to 17 permit medical inspections as herein authorized, including examinations 18 pursuant to subdivision two of this section, shall be deemed to have 19 waived [his or her] their rights under this section in respect to 20 expenses for medical treatment or hospital care rendered and for salary 21 or wages payable after such refusal. 22 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a provider of 23 medical treatment or hospital care furnished pursuant to the provisions 24 of this section shall not collect or attempt to collect reimbursement 25 for such treatment or care from any such police officer, any such 26 advanced ambulance medical technician or any such detention officer. 27 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 207-c of the general municipal law, as 28 amended by section 56 of chapter 476 of the laws of 2018, is amended to 29 read as follows: 30 1. Any sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or corrections officer of 31 the sheriff's department of any county (hereinafter referred to as a 32 "police officer") or any member of a police force of any county, city of 33 less than one million population, town or village, or of any district, 34 agency, board, body or commission thereof, or a detective-investigator 35 or any other investigator who is a police officer pursuant to the 36 provisions of the criminal procedure law employed in the office of a 37 district attorney of any county, or any corrections officer of the coun- 38 ty of Erie department of corrections, or an advanced ambulance medical 39 technician employed by the county of Nassau, or any detention officer 40 employed by the city of Yonkers, or any supervising fire inspector, fire 41 inspector, fire marshal or assistant fire marshal employed full-time in 42 the county of Nassau fire marshal's office, or at the option of the 43 county of Nassau, any probation officer of the county of Nassau who is 44 injured in the performance of [his or her] their duties or who is taken 45 sick as a result of the performance of [his or her] their duties so as 46 to necessitate medical or other lawful remedial treatment shall be paid 47 by the municipality by which [he or she is] they are employed the full 48 amount of [his or her] their regular salary or wages until [his or her] 49 their disability arising therefrom has ceased, and, in addition such 50 municipality shall be liable for all medical treatment and hospital care 51 necessitated by reason of such injury or illness. For the purposes of 52 this section, such disability shall include post-traumatic stress disor- 53 der, as diagnosed by a psychiatrist or psychologist, and shall be 54 presumed to have been incurred during service in the line of duty and 55 shall be compensable under this section, unless it is shown by a prepon- 56 derance of the evidence that that post-traumatic stress disorder was A. 8037 4 1 caused solely by nonservice-connected risk factors or nonservice-con- 2 nected exposure. Provided, however, and notwithstanding the foregoing 3 provisions of this section, the municipal health authorities or any 4 physician appointed for the purpose by the municipality, after a deter- 5 mination has first been made that such injury or sickness was incurred 6 during, or resulted from, such performance of duty, may attend any such 7 injured or sick police officer, from time to time, for the purpose of 8 providing medical, surgical or other treatment, or for making 9 inspections and the municipality shall not be liable for salary or wages 10 payable to such police officer, or for the cost of medical treatment or 11 hospital care furnished after such date as such health authorities or 12 physician shall certify that such injured or sick police officer has 13 recovered and is physically able to perform [his or her] their regular 14 duties. Any injured or sick police officer who shall refuse to accept 15 medical treatment or hospital care or shall refuse to permit medical 16 inspections as herein authorized, including examinations pursuant to 17 subdivision two of this section, shall be deemed to have waived [his or 18 her] their rights under this section in respect to expenses for medical 19 treatment or hospital care rendered and for salary or wages payable 20 after such refusal. 21 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a provider of 22 medical treatment or hospital care furnished pursuant to the provisions 23 of this section shall not collect or attempt to collect reimbursement 24 for such treatment or care from any such police officer, a member of a 25 police force of any county, city, any such advanced ambulance medical 26 technician, any such detention officer or any such detective-investiga- 27 tor or any other such investigator who is a police officer pursuant to 28 the provisions of the criminal procedure law. 29 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 30 the amendments to subdivision 1 of section 207-c of the general munici- 31 pal law made by section three of this act shall take effect on the same 32 date and in the same manner as chapter 628 of the laws of 1991, takes 33 effect.